Indiana, session 2026, SB267.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 2-7-1-1.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.58-2010, SECTION
5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 1.3. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), "candidate"
refers to a candidate for election to the general assembly.
(b) For purposes of section 2.5 of this chapter, "candidate"
refers to a candidate for election as a state officer (as defined in
IC 4-2-6-1).
SECTION 2. IC 2-7-1-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.5. "Executive person" means any of the following:
(1) A state officer (as defined in IC 4-2-6-1).
(2) A candidate.
(3) An employee of the executive branch of state government.
(4) A close relative of anyone described in subdivision (1), (2),
or (3). However, a lobbyist under this article or IC 4-2-8 who
is a close relative of an executive person is not considered an
executive person.
SB 267—LS 7103/DI 144


(5) A paid consultant of the executive branch of state
government.
(6) An official of an agency of the executive branch of state
government.
SECTION 3. IC 2-7-1-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. "Influence campaign" means an action or effort
to mobilize or encourage members of the public to take action or
to contact a legislative person or an executive person. The term
includes providing compensation to a person to rally, gather,
demonstrate, engage, or confront a legislative person or an
executive person on public property.
SECTION 4. IC 2-7-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 8. Influence Campaign Reports
Sec. 1. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d), a person who
provides another person with at least five hundred dollars ($500)
in compensation to induce, support, aid, or otherwise encourage
the other person to engage in an influence campaign shall file a
written report with the commission under section 2 of this chapter.
(b) A person required to file a report under subsection (a) must
file the report not later than twenty-four (24) hours after providing
the compensation.
(c) For purposes of subsection (a), the amount of compensation
must be calculated by determining the total amount or value of
compensation provided to the person, in the aggregate, during a
year.
(d) Subsection (a) does not apply if the compensation is
otherwise reported to the commission under this article or to the
Indiana department of administration under IC 4-2-8-3.
Sec. 2. The report required under section 1 of this chapter must
include the following:
(1) If the person who provided the compensation is an
individual, the name, address, business or occupation, and
employer of the individual.
(2) If the person who provided the compensation is not an
individual, the names, addresses, and titles of the officers or
controlling individuals responsible for managing the person's
affairs.
(3) The name, address, business or occupation, and employer
of all other persons who:
SB 267—LS 7103/DI 144


(A) participated in organizing or managing the influence
campaign; or
(B) were hired to assist the influence campaign, including
any public relations, consulting, or advertising firms.
The report must also include the terms of compensation for a
person described in this subdivision.
(4) The following information concerning each source of
funding of at least twenty-five dollars ($25) for the influence
campaign:
(A) The name and address of each person using public
funds to support the influence campaign.
(B) The name and address of a person whose funds were
used to pay for the influence campaign. For purposes of
this clause, the report must include:
(i) the amount of funds used to pay for the influence
campaign; and
(ii) if the person is an individual, the individual's
occupation and employer.
(5) The purpose of the influence campaign, including any
specific legislation, rules, rates, standards, or other executive
or legislative proposals that are the subject matter of the
campaign.
(6) The following information concerning expenditures made
or incurred on behalf of the influence campaign, as of the date
of the report:
(A) The total amount of all expenditures.
(B) An itemization of expenditures according to the
following categories:
(i) Advertising.
(ii) Consulting.
(iii) Office and administrative expenses.
(iv) Payments made to an individual for the purpose of
mobilizing the person to take action or contact a
legislative person or an executive person.
(v) Printing and mailing expenses.
(C) The amount, date, and purpose of each expenditure.
(D) The name and mailing address of each payee.
(7) Other information required by the commission by rule.
Sec. 3. (a) Each person that has filed an initial report under
section 1 of this chapter shall file a subsequent report with the
commission not later than twenty-four (24) hours after each
instance in which the person provides compensation for an
SB 267—LS 7103/DI 144


influence campaign during the same calendar year in which the
initial report was filed.
(b) A subsequent report under subsection (a) must include the
information required under section 2 of this chapter.
SB 267—LS 7103/DI 144


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Elections, to which was
referred Senate Bill No. 267, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill DO PASS.
(Reference is to SB 267 as introduced.)
GASKILL, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 6, Nays 3
SB 267—LS 7103/DI 144